Maine, session 132, LD355.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Transfer of settlement funds. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, the State Controller shall transfer $625,000 from the Administration -
Attorney General, Other Special Revenue Funds account within the Department of the
Attorney General from funds received from settlement agreements to the Maine Retirement
Savings Program Enterprise fund no later than June 30, 2027.
Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
MAINE RETIREMENT SAVINGS BOARD
Maine Retirement Savings Program Z326
Initiative: Allocates funds to the Maine Retirement Savings Program Enterprise Fund to be
used in accordance with the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, chapter 7-A.
MAINE RETIREMENT SAVINGS PROGRAM 2025-26 2026-27
ENTERPRISE FUND
All Other $0 $625,000
__________ __________
MAINE RETIREMENT SAVINGS PROGRAM $0 $625,000
ENTERPRISE FUND TOTAL
Page 1 - 132LR0337(05)